Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201683-183.01
Persons committed; wages; disposition; director; adopt rules and regulations.

A person committed to the department, who is earning at least minimum wage and is employed pursuant to sections 81-1827 and 83-183, shall have his or her wages set aside by the chief executive officer of the facility in a separate wage fund. The director shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations which will protect the inmate's rights to due process, provide for hearing as necessary before the Crime Victim's Reparations Committee, and govern the disposition of a confined person's gross monthly wage minus required payroll deductions and payment of necessary work-related incidental expenses for the following purposes:

(1) For the support of families and dependent relatives of the respective inmates;

(2) For the discharge of any legal obligations, including judgments for restitution as provided in section 83-184.01;

(3) To pay all or a part of the cost of their board, room, clothing, medical, dental, and other correctional services;

(4) To provide for funds payable to the person committed to the department upon his or her release;

(5) For the actual value of state property intentionally or willfully and wantonly destroyed by such person during his or her commitment;

(6) For reasonable costs incurred in returning such person to the facility to which he or she is committed in the event of escape; and

(7) For deposit in the Victim's Compensation Fund.

Laws 1980, LB 319, § 11;

Laws 1986, LB 540, § 40;

Laws 1987, LB 353, § 3;

Laws 2015, LB605, § 95.

Section 83-183, when construed with this section, does not require that an inmate be provided with full-time employment as a prerequisite to the applicability of rules and regulations promulgated under the authority of this section. Hurbenca v. Nebraska Dept. of Corr. Servs., 18 Neb. App. 31, 773 N.W.2d 402 (2009).